California statutes. Penal Code
(1) The property is not possessed for personal use and the person has the intent to sell or exchange the property for value, or the intent to act in concert with one or more persons to sell or exchange the property for value.

(2) The value of the possessed property exceeds
 nine hundred fifty dollars ($950). For purposes of determining the value of the property, the property described in paragraph (1) can be considered in the aggregate with any of the following:

(A) Any other such property possessed by the person with such intent within the last two years.

(B) Any property possessed by another person acting in concert with the first person to sell or exchange the property for value, when that property was acquired through one or more acts of theft from a vehicle, unlawful entry of a vehicle, burglary of a locked vehicle, or vehicle tampering as defined in Section 10852 of the Vehicle Code, regardless of the identity of the person committing the acts of theft, burglary, or vehicle tampering.

(b) For the purpose of determining, in any proceeding, whether the defendant had the intent to
 sell or exchange the property for value, the trier of fact may consider any competent evidence, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Whether the defendant has in the past two years sold or exchanged for value any property acquired through theft from a vehicle, burglary of a locked vehicle, or vehicle tampering as defined in Section 10852 of the Vehicle Code, or through any related offenses, including any conduct that occurred in other jurisdictions, if relevant to demonstrate a fact other than the defendant’s disposition to commit the act, as provided by subdivision (b) of Section 1101 of the Evidence Code.

(2) Whether the property involved in the offense is of a type or quantity that would not normally be purchased for personal use or consumption, including use or consumption by one’s immediate family.

(c) A violation of subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for up to one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(d) This section does not preclude or prohibit prosecution under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 170, Sec. 2.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

496.6.

(a) Any person who possesses property unlawfully that was acquired through one or more acts of shoplifting, theft, or burglary from a retail business, whether or not the person committed the act of shoplifting, theft, or burglary, is guilty of the unlawful deprivation of a retail business opportunity when both of the following apply:

(1) The property is not possessed for personal use and the person has the intent to sell, exchange, or return the merchandise for value, or the intent to act in concert with one or more persons to sell, exchange, or return the merchandise for value.

(2) The value of the possessed property exceeds nine hundred fifty dollars ($950). For purposes of
 determining the value of the property, the property described in paragraph (1) can be considered in the aggregate with either of the following:

(A) Any other such property possessed by the person with such intent within the prior two years.

(B) Any property possessed by another person acting in concert with the first person to sell, exchange, or return the merchandise for value, when such property was acquired through one or more acts of shoplifting, theft, or burglary from a retail business, regardless of the identity of the person committing the act of shoplifting, theft, or burglary.

(b) For the purpose of determining in any proceeding whether the defendant has the intent to sell, exchange, or return the merchandise for value, the trier of fact may consider any competent evidence, including, but not limited to,
 the following:

(1) Whether the defendant has in the prior two years sold, exchanged, or returned for value merchandise acquired through shoplifting, theft, or burglary from a retail business, or through any related offense, including any conduct that occurred in other jurisdictions, if relevant to demonstrate a fact other than the defendant’s disposition to commit the act, as provided by subdivision (b) of Section 1101 of the Evidence Code.

(2) The property involved in the offense is of a type or quantity that would not normally be purchased for personal use or consumption, including use or consumption by one’s immediate family.

(c) The criminal deprivation of a retail business opportunity is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for up to one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section
 1170.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 168, Sec. 3.   (AB 2943)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

496a.

(a) Every person who is a dealer in or collector of junk, metals, or secondhand materials, or the agent, employee, or representative of such dealer or collector, and who buys or receives any wire, cable, copper, lead, solder, mercury, iron, or brass which they know or reasonably should know is ordinarily used by or ordinarily belongs to a railroad or other transportation, telephone, telegraph, gas, water, or electric light company, or a county, city, city and county, or other political subdivision of this state engaged in furnishing public utility service, without using due diligence to ascertain that the person selling or delivering the same has a legal right to do so, is guilty of criminally receiving that property, and shall be punished by a
 fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person who buys or receives material pursuant to subdivision (a) shall obtain evidence of their identity from the seller, including, but not limited to, that person’s full name, signature, address, driver’s license number, and vehicle license number, and the license number of the vehicle delivering the material.

(c) The record of the transaction shall include an appropriate description of the material purchased and the record shall be maintained
 pursuant to Section 21607 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 694, Sec. 3.   (AB 476)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

496b.

Every person who, being a dealer in or collector of second-hand books or other literary material, or the agent, employee or representative of such dealer, or collector, buys or receives any book, manuscript, map, chart, or other work of literature, belonging to, and bearing any mark or indicia of ownership by a public or incorporated library, college or university, without ascertaining by diligent inquiry that the person selling or delivering the same has a legal right to do so, is guilty of criminally receiving such property in the first degree if such property be of the value of more than fifty dollars, and is punishable by
 imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than twice the value of the property received, or by both such fine and imprisonment; and is guilty of criminally receiving such property in the second degree if such property be of the value of fifty dollars or under, and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one month, or by a fine of not more than twice the value of the property received, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1923, Ch. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

496c.

Any person who shall copy, transcribe, photograph or otherwise make a record or memorandum of the contents of any private and unpublished paper, book, record, map or file, containing information relating to the title to real property or containing information used in the business of examining, certifying or insuring titles to real property and belonging to any person, firm or corporation engaged in the business of examining, certifying, or insuring titles to real property, without the consent of the owner of such paper, book, record, map or file, and with the intent to use the same or the contents thereof, or to dispose of the same or
 the contents thereof to others for use, in the business of examining, certifying, or insuring titles to real property, shall be guilty of theft, and any person who shall induce another to violate the provisions of this section by giving, offering, or promising to such another any gift, gratuity, or thing of value or by doing or promising to do any act beneficial to such another, shall be guilty of theft; and any person who shall receive or acquire from another any copy, transcription, photograph or other record or memorandum of the contents of any private and unpublished paper, book, record, map or file containing information relating to the title to real property or containing information used in the business of examining, certifying or insuring titles to real property, with the knowledge that the same or the contents thereof has or have been acquired, prepared or compiled in violation of this section shall be guilty of theft. The contents of any such private and unpublished paper, book, record, map or file
 is hereby defined to be personal property, and in determining the value thereof for the purposes of this section the cost of acquiring and compiling the same shall be the test.

(History: Added by Stats. 1931, Ch. 732.)
-------------------------------------------

496d.

(a) Every person who buys or receives any motor vehicle, as defined in Section 415 of the Vehicle Code, any trailer, as defined in Section 630 of the Vehicle Code, any special construction equipment, as defined in Section 565 of the Vehicle Code, or any vessel, as defined in Section 21 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, that has been stolen or that has been obtained in any manner constituting theft or extortion, knowing the property to be
 stolen or obtained, or who conceals, sells, withholds, or aids in concealing, selling, or withholding any motor vehicle, trailer, special construction equipment, or vessel from the owner, knowing the property to be so stolen or obtained, shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months or two or three years or a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both, or by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year or a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the terms “special construction equipment” and “vessel” are limited to motorized vehicles and vessels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 374.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

496e.

(a) Any person who is engaged in the salvage, recycling, purchase, or sale of scrap metal and who possesses any of the following items that were owned or previously owned by any public agency, city, county, city and county, special district, or private utility that have been stolen or obtained in any manner constituting theft or extortion, knowing the property to be so stolen or obtained, or fails to report possession of the items pursuant to Section 21609.1 of the Business and Professions Code, is guilty of a crime:

(1) A fire hydrant or any reasonably recognizable part of that hydrant.

(2) Any fire department
 connection, including, but not limited to, reasonably recognizable bronze or brass fittings and parts.

(3) Maintenance hole covers or lids, or any reasonably recognizable part of those maintenance hole covers and lids.

(4) Backflow devices and connections to that device, or any part of that device.

(5) Reasonably recognizable street lights, traffic signals, and their reasonably recognizable related equipment, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Controller devices.

(B) Light-emitting diode (LED) fixtures.

(C) Ornamental
 or historical, modern, or pedestrian poles made of concrete, steel, brass, cast iron, or aluminum.

(D) Solar street lighting components, such as solar panels, steel poles, and battery packs.

(E) Colocation equipment.

(F) Conductors, wiring, and cabling, including fiber optic cables.

(G) Cameras.

(H) Air quality sensors.

(I) Digital banners and signs.

(J) Pedestrian and cycling counters.

(6) Active grade crossing
 signals.

(7) Sewer flow monitoring station equipment.

(8) Sewer pump station instrumentation and controls.

(9) Stormwater auto sampling equipment and instrumentation.

(10) Stormwater pump station instrumentation and controls.

(11) Irrigation wiring.

(12) Plaques.

(13) Communications or broadband infrastructure or equipment.

(14) Electric vehicle chargers.

(15) Water
 meters and water meter components.

(b) A person who violates subdivision (a) shall, in addition to any other penalty provided by law, be subject to a criminal fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 694, Sec. 4.   (AB 476)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

497.

Every person who, in another state or country steals or embezzles the property of another, or receives such property knowing it to have been stolen or embezzled, and brings the same into this state, may be convicted and punished in the same manner as if such larceny, or embezzlement, or receiving, had been committed in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1905, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

498.

(a) The following definitions govern the construction of this section:

(1) “Person” means any individual, or any partnership, firm, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity.

(2) “Utility” means any electrical, gas, or water corporation as those terms are defined in the Public Utilities Code, and electrical,
 gas, or water systems operated by any political subdivision.

(3) “Customer” means the person in whose name utility service is provided.

(4) “Utility service” means the provision of electricity, gas, water, or any other service provided by the utility for compensation.

(5) “Divert” means to change the intended course or path of electricity, gas, or water without the authorization or consent of the utility.

(6) “Tamper” means to rearrange, injure, alter, interfere with, or otherwise prevent from performing a normal or customary function.

(7) “Reconnection” means the reconnection of utility service by a customer or other person after service has been lawfully disconnected by the utility.

(b) Any person who, with intent to obtain for himself or herself utility services without paying the full lawful charge therefor, or with intent to enable another person to do so, or with intent to deprive any utility of any part of the full lawful charge for utility services it provides, commits, authorizes, solicits, aids, or abets any of the following shall be guilty of a misdemeanor:

(1) Diverts or causes to be diverted utility services, by any means.

(2) Prevents any utility meter, or other device used in determining the charge for utility services, from accurately performing its measuring function by tampering or by any other means.

(3) Tampers with any property owned by or used by the utility to provide utility services.

(4) Makes or causes to be made any connection with or reconnection with property owned or used by the utility to provide utility services without the authorization or consent of the utility.

(5) Uses or receives the direct benefit of all or a portion of utility services with knowledge or reason to believe that the diversion, tampering, or unauthorized connection existed at the time of that use, or that the use or receipt was otherwise without the authorization or consent of the utility.

(c) In any prosecution under this section, the presence of any of the following objects, circumstances, or conditions on premises controlled by the customer or by the person using or receiving the direct benefit of all or a portion of utility services obtained in violation of this section shall permit an inference that the customer or
 person intended to and did violate this section:

(1) Any instrument, apparatus, or device primarily designed to be used to obtain utility services without paying the full lawful charge therefor.

(2) Any meter that has been altered, tampered with, or bypassed so as to cause no measurement or inaccurate measurement of utility services.

(d) If the value of all utility services obtained in violation of this section totals more than nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or if the defendant has previously been convicted of an offense under this section or any former section which would be an offense under this section, or of an offense under the laws of another state or of the United States which would have been an offense under this section if committed in this state, then the violation is punishable by imprisonment in a
 county jail for not more than one year, or in the state prison.

(e) This section shall not be construed to preclude the applicability of any other provision of the criminal law of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 24.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

499.

(a) Any person who, having been convicted of a previous violation of Section 10851 of the Vehicle Code, or of subdivision (d) of Section 487, involving a vehicle or vessel, and having served a term therefor in any penal institution or having been imprisoned therein as a condition of probation for the offense, is subsequently convicted of a violation of Section 499b, involving a vehicle or vessel, is punishable for the subsequent offense by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year or the state prison for 16
 months, two, or three years.

(b) Any person convicted of a violation of Section 499b, who has been previously convicted under charges separately brought and tried two or more times of a violation of Section 499b, all such violations involving a vehicle or vessel, and who has been imprisoned therefore as a condition of probation or otherwise at least once, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or in the state prison for 16 months, two, or three years.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1997.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1125, Sec. 8.   Effective October 11, 1993.   Section operative January 1, 1997, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

499b.

(a) Any person who shall, without the permission of the owner thereof, take any bicycle for the purpose of temporarily using or operating the same, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding four hundred dollars ($400), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding three months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person who shall, without the permission of the owner thereof, take any vessel for the purpose of temporarily using or
 operating the same, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

499c.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Access” means to approach, a way or means of approaching, nearing, admittance to, including to instruct, communicate with, store information in, or retrieve information from a computer system or computer network.

(2) “Article” means any object, material, device, or substance or
 copy thereof, including any writing, record, recording, drawing, sample, specimen, prototype, model, photograph, micro-organism, blueprint, map, or tangible representation of a computer program or information, including both human and computer readable information and information while in transit.

(3) “Benefit” means gain or advantage, or anything regarded by the beneficiary as gain or advantage, including benefit to any other person or entity in whose welfare he or she is interested.

(4) “Computer system” means a machine or collection of machines, one or more of which contain computer programs and information, that performs functions, including, but not limited to, logic, arithmetic, information storage and retrieval, communications, and control.

(5) “Computer network” means an interconnection of two or more
 computer systems.

(6) “Computer program” means an ordered set of instructions or statements, and related information that, when automatically executed in actual or modified form in a computer system, causes it to perform specified functions.

(7) “Copy” means any facsimile, replica, photograph or other reproduction of an article, and any note, drawing or sketch made of or from an article.

(8) “Representing” means describing, depicting, containing, constituting, reflecting or recording.

(9) “Trade secret” means information, including a formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or process, that:

(A) Derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not
 being generally known to the public or to other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use; and

(B) Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.

(b) Every person is guilty of theft who, with intent to deprive or withhold the control of a trade secret from its owner, or with an intent to appropriate a trade secret to his or her own use or to the use of another, does any of the following:

(1) Steals, takes, carries away, or uses without authorization, a trade secret.

(2) Fraudulently appropriates any article representing a trade secret entrusted to him or her.

(3) Having unlawfully obtained access to the article, without
 authority makes or causes to be made a copy of any article representing a trade secret.

(4) Having obtained access to the article through a relationship of trust and confidence, without authority and in breach of the obligations created by that relationship, makes or causes to be made, directly from and in the presence of the article, a copy of any article representing a trade secret.

(c) Every person who promises, offers or gives, or conspires to promise or offer to give, to any present or former agent, employee or servant of another, a benefit as an inducement, bribe or reward for conveying, delivering or otherwise making available an article representing a trade secret owned by his or her present or former principal, employer or master, to any person not authorized by the owner to receive or acquire the trade secret and every present or former agent, employee, or servant, who
 solicits, accepts, receives or takes a benefit as an inducement, bribe or reward for conveying, delivering or otherwise making available an article representing a trade secret owned by his or her present or former principal, employer or master, to any person not authorized by the owner to receive or acquire the trade secret, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(d) In a prosecution for a violation of this section, it shall be no defense that the person returned or intended to return the article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 375.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

499d.

Any person who operates or takes an aircraft not his own, without the consent of the owner thereof, and with intent to either permanently or temporarily deprive the owner thereof of his title to or possession of such vehicle, whether with or without intent to steal the same, or any person who is a party or accessory to or an accomplice in any operation or unauthorized taking or stealing is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by
 imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 376.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

500.

(a) Any person who receives money for the actual or purported purpose of transmitting the same or its equivalent to foreign countries as specified in Section 1800.5 of the Financial Code who fails to do at least one of the following acts unless otherwise instructed by the customer is guilty of a misdemeanor or felony as set forth in subdivision (b):

(1) Forward the money as
 represented to the customer within 10 days of receipt of the funds.

(2) Give instructions within 10 days of receipt of the customer’s funds, committing equivalent funds to the person designated by the customer.

(3) Refund to the customer any money not forwarded as represented within 10 days of the customer’s written request for a refund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1810.5 of the Financial Code.

(b) (1) If the total value of the funds received from the customer is less than nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), the offense set forth in subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(2) If the
 total value of the money received from the customer is nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or more, or if the total value of all moneys received by the person from different customers is nine hundred fifty dollars ($950) or more, and the receipts were part of a common scheme or plan, the offense set forth in subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, two, or three years, by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 377.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

501.

Upon a trial for larceny or embezzlement of money, bank notes, certificates of stock, or valuable securities, the allegation of the indictment or information, so far as regards the description of the property, is sustained, if the offender be proved to have embezzled or stolen any money, bank notes, certificates of stock, or valuable security, although the particular species of coin or other money, or the number, denomination, or kind of bank notes, certificates of stock, or valuable security, is not proved; and upon a trial for embezzlement, if the offender is proved to have embezzled any piece of coin or other
 money, any bank note, certificate of stock, or valuable security, although the piece of coin or other money, or bank note, certificate of stock, or valuable security, may have been delivered to him or her in order that some part of the value thereof should be returned to the party delivering the same, and such part shall have been returned accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 897, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

502.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to expand the degree of protection afforded to individuals, businesses, and governmental agencies from tampering, interference, damage, and unauthorized access to lawfully created computer data and computer systems. The Legislature finds and declares that the proliferation of computer technology has resulted in a concomitant proliferation of computer crime and other forms of unauthorized access to computers, computer systems, and computer data.

The Legislature further finds and declares that protection of the integrity of all types and forms of lawfully created computers, computer systems, and computer data is vital to the protection of the privacy of individuals as well as to the well-being of financial institutions,
 business concerns, governmental agencies, and others within this state that lawfully utilize those computers, computer systems, and data.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Access” means to gain entry to, instruct, cause input to, cause output from, cause data processing with, or communicate with, the logical, arithmetical, or memory function resources of a computer, computer system, or computer network.

(2) “Computer network” means any system that provides communications between one or more computer systems and input/output devices, including, but not limited to, display terminals, remote systems, mobile devices, and printers connected by telecommunication facilities.

(3) “Computer program or
 software” means a set of instructions or statements, and related data, that when executed in actual or modified form, cause a computer, computer system, or computer network to perform specified functions.

(4) “Computer services” includes, but is not limited to, computer time, data processing, or storage functions, internet services, electronic mail services, electronic message services, or other uses of a computer, computer system, or computer network.

(5) “Computer system” means a device or collection of devices, including support devices and excluding calculators that are not programmable and capable of being used in conjunction with external files, one or more of which contain
 computer programs, electronic instructions, input data, and output data, that performs functions, including, but not limited to, logic, arithmetic, data storage and retrieval, communication, and control.
 A “computer system” includes, without limitation, any such device or system that is located within, connected to, or otherwise integrated with, any motor vehicle as defined in Section 415 of the Vehicle Code.

(6) “Government computer system” means any computer system, or part thereof, that is owned, operated, or used by any federal, state, or local governmental entity.

(7) “Public safety infrastructure computer system” means any computer system, or part thereof, that is necessary for the health and safety of the public including computer systems owned, operated, or used by drinking water and wastewater treatment facilities, hospitals, emergency service providers, telecommunication companies, and gas and electric utility companies.

(8) “Data” means a representation of
 information, knowledge, facts, concepts, computer software, or computer programs or instructions. Data may be in any form, in storage media, or as stored in the memory of the computer or in transit or presented on a display device.

(9) “Supporting documentation” includes, but is not limited to, all information, in any form, pertaining to the design, construction, classification, implementation, use, or modification of a computer, computer system, computer network, computer program, or computer software, which information is not generally available to the public and is necessary for the operation of a computer, computer system, computer network, computer program, or computer software.

(10) “Injury” means any alteration, deletion, damage, or destruction of a computer system, computer network, computer program, or data caused by the access, or the denial of access to legitimate users
 of a computer system, network, or program.

(11) “Victim expenditure” means any expenditure reasonably and necessarily incurred by the owner or lessee to verify that a computer system, computer network, computer program, or data was or was not altered, deleted, damaged, or destroyed by the access.

(12) “Computer contaminant” means any set of computer instructions that are designed to modify, damage, destroy, record, or transmit information within a computer, computer system, or computer network without the intent or permission of the owner of the information. They include, but are not limited to, a group of computer instructions commonly called viruses or worms, that are self-replicating or self-propagating and are designed to contaminate other computer programs or computer data, consume computer resources, modify, destroy, record, or transmit data, or in some other fashion usurp
 the normal operation of the computer, computer system, or computer network.

(13) “Internet domain name” means a globally unique, hierarchical reference to an internet host or service, assigned through centralized internet naming authorities, comprising a series of character strings separated by periods, with the rightmost character string specifying the top of the hierarchy.

(14) “Electronic mail” means an electronic message or computer file that is transmitted between two or more
 telecommunications devices; computers; computer networks, regardless of whether the network is a local, regional, or global network; or electronic devices capable of receiving electronic messages, regardless of whether the message is converted to hard copy format after receipt, viewed upon transmission, or stored for later retrieval.

(15) “Profile” means either of the following:

(A) A configuration of user data required by a computer so that the user may access programs or services and have the desired functionality on that computer.

(B) An
 Internet website user’s personal page or section of a page that is made up of data, in text or graphical form, that displays significant, unique, or identifying information, including, but not limited to, listing acquaintances, interests, associations, activities, or personal statements.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (h), any person who commits any of the following acts is guilty of a public offense:

(1) Knowingly accesses and without permission alters, damages, deletes, destroys, or otherwise uses any data, computer, computer system, or computer network in order to either (A) devise or execute any scheme or artifice to defraud, deceive, or extort, or (B) wrongfully control or obtain money, property, or data.

(2) Knowingly accesses and without permission takes,
 copies, or makes use of any data from a computer, computer system, or computer network, or takes or copies any supporting documentation, whether existing or residing internal or external to a computer, computer system, or computer network.

(3) Knowingly and without permission uses or causes to be used computer services.

(4) Knowingly accesses and without permission adds, alters, damages, deletes, or destroys any data, computer software, or computer programs which reside or exist internal or external to a computer, computer system, or computer network.

(5) Knowingly and without permission disrupts or causes the disruption of computer services or denies or causes the denial of computer services to an authorized user of a computer, computer system, or computer network.

(6) Knowingly and without permission provides or assists in providing a means of accessing a computer, computer system, or computer network in violation of this section.

(7) Knowingly and without permission accesses or causes to be accessed any computer, computer system, or computer network.

(8) Knowingly introduces any computer contaminant into any computer, computer system, or computer network.

(9) Knowingly and without permission uses the internet domain name or profile of another individual, corporation, or entity in connection with the sending of one or more electronic mail messages or posts and
 thereby damages or causes damage to a computer, computer data, computer system, or computer network.

(10) Knowingly and without permission disrupts or causes the disruption of government computer services or denies or causes the denial of government computer services to an authorized user of a government computer, computer system, or computer network.

(11) Knowingly accesses and without permission adds, alters, damages, deletes, or destroys any data, computer software, or computer programs which reside or exist internal or external to a public safety infrastructure computer system computer, computer system, or computer network.

(12) Knowingly and without permission disrupts or causes the disruption of public safety infrastructure computer system computer services or denies or causes the denial of computer services to
 an authorized user of a public safety infrastructure computer system computer, computer system, or computer network.

(13) Knowingly and without permission provides or assists in providing a means of accessing a computer, computer system, or public safety infrastructure computer system computer, computer system, or computer network in violation of this section.

(14) Knowingly introduces any computer contaminant into any public safety infrastructure computer system computer, computer system, or computer network.

(d) (1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of paragraph (1), (2), (4), (5), (10), (11), or (12) of subdivision (c) is guilty of a felony, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years and a fine not exceeding ten
 thousand dollars ($10,000), or a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) Any person who violates paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) is punishable as follows:

(A) For the first violation that does not result in injury, and where the value of the computer services used does not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(B) For any violation that results in a victim expenditure in an amount greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or in an injury, or if the value of the computer services used exceeds nine hundred fifty dollars
 ($950), or for any second or subsequent violation, by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for 16 months, or two or three years, or by both that fine and imprisonment, or by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(3) Any person who violates paragraph (6), (7), or (13) of subdivision (c) is punishable as follows:

(A) For a first violation that does not result in injury, an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(B) For any violation that results in a victim expenditure in an amount not greater than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or for a second or subsequent violation, by a fine not
 exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.
